tests/chaa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../tyv.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../tyv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] stuff with чаа":
    ча<n><dat> : чага
    чай<n><dat> : чайга
    чаң<n><dat> : чаңга
    чаг<n><dat> : чагга
    ча<n><px2sg><dat> : чаңга
    чай<n><px2sg><dat> : чайыңга
    чаң<n><px3sp><nom> : чаңы
    чаг<n><px3sp><nom> : чаа
    чаа<n><nom> : чаа
    чаа<n><attr> : чаа

 "[twol] stuff with -г":
    округ<n><dat> : округка

 "[twol] stuff with -ң (we don't want an оң reading here)": 
    оон<adv> : оон
    ол<prn><dem><abl> : оон
    ол<prn><pers><p3><sg><abl> : оон
